Maine, session 132, LD1428.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §8302-A, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Recreational space. A child care facility or a family child care provider may
operate without an outdoor recreational space as long as an outside public recreational
space is available within a reasonable distance from the facility or provider.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §4364-D is enacted to read:
§4364-D. Child care services in residential areas
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Child care facility" has the same meaning as in Title 22, section 8301-A,
subsection 1-A, paragraph B.
B. "Family child care provider" has the same meaning as in Title 22, section 8301-A,
subsection 1-A, paragraph C.
2. Location of child care. A child care facility or a family child care provider is a
permitted use in a municipal area that is zoned for residential purposes, subject to the same
requirements for other residential property.
Page 1 - 132LR1471(03)